Hawaii statutes.
§667-22 Notice of default
and intention to foreclose; contents; distribution. (a) When the mortgagor or the borrower has breached the mortgage
agreement, and when the foreclosing mortgagee intends to conduct a power of
sale foreclosure under this part, the foreclosing mortgagee shall prepare a
written notice of default and intention to foreclose addressed to the
mortgagor, the borrower, and any guarantor. The notice of default and
intention to foreclose shall state:

(1) The name and address of the current
mortgagee;

(2) The name and last known address
of the mortgagors, the borrowers, and any guarantors;

(3) With respect to the
mortgaged property, the address or a description of its location, tax map key number, and certificate of title or transfer certificate of title number if
registered in the land court;

(4) The description of the default
or, if the default is a monetary default, an itemization of
the delinquent amount;

(5) The action required to cure the
default, including the delinquent amount and the
estimated amount of the foreclosing mortgagee's attorney's fees and costs, and
all other fees and costs related to the default estimated to be incurred by the
foreclosing mortgagee by the deadline date;

(6) The date by which the default
must be cured, which shall be at least sixty days after the date of the notice
of default and intention to foreclose;

(7) A statement that if the default
is not cured by the deadline date stated in the notice of default and intention
to foreclose, the entire unpaid balance of the moneys owed to the mortgagee
under the mortgage agreement will become due, that the mortgagee intends to
conduct a power of sale foreclosure to sell the mortgaged property at a public
sale without any court action and without going to court, and that the
mortgagee or any other person may acquire the mortgaged property at the public
sale;

(8) A statement that if the default is not cured by
the deadline date stated in the notice of default and intention to foreclose,
the mortgagee may publish the public notice of the public sale in a newspaper
of general circulation or on a state website, pursuant to section 667-27(d);

(9) The name, address, electronic
address, and telephone number of the attorney who is representing the
foreclosing mortgagee; provided that the attorney shall be licensed to practice
law in the State and physically located in the State; and

(10) Notice of the right of the
owner-occupant to elect to participate in any other process as
established by law.

(b) The notice of default
and intention to foreclose shall also contain wording substantially similar to
the following in all capital letters and printed in not less than
fourteen-point font:

"IF
THE DEFAULT ON THE LOAN CONTINUES AFTER THE DEADLINE DATE IN THIS NOTICE, THE
MORTGAGED PROPERTY MAY BE FORECLOSED AND SOLD WITHOUT ANY COURT ACTION AND
WITHOUT GOING TO COURT.

YOU
MAY HAVE CERTAIN LEGAL RIGHTS OR DEFENSES. FOR ADVICE, YOU SHOULD CONSULT WITH
AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN THIS STATE.

ALL
FUTURE NOTICES AND CORRESPONDENCE WILL BE MAILED TO YOU AT THE ADDRESS AT WHICH
YOU RECEIVED THIS NOTICE UNLESS YOU SEND WRITTEN INSTRUCTIONS TO THIS OFFICE
INFORMING THIS OFFICE OF A DIFFERENT ADDRESS. THE WRITTEN INSTRUCTIONS MUST BE
SENT TO THIS OFFICE BY CERTIFIED MAIL, REGISTERED MAIL, OR EXPRESS MAIL,
POSTAGE PREPAID AND RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED."

(c)
The notice of default and intention to foreclose shall include a copy of:

(1) The original mortgage agreement, and
copies of any subsequent mortgage agreements and assignments;

(2) The promissory note signed by the
mortgagor and any endorsements and allonges on the note; and

(3) Any other documents that amend or alter
the terms of the original mortgage agreement that were signed by the mortgagor
and the mortgagee or any successors or assigns of the mortgagor or the
mortgagee.

(d)
The notice of default and intention to foreclose shall also
include contact information for approved housing counselors and approved budget
and credit counselors.

(e)
The foreclosing mortgagee shall have the notice of default and intention to
foreclose served on:

(1) The mortgagor and the borrower;

(2) Any prior or junior creditors who have a
recorded lien on the mortgaged property before the recordation of the notice of
default and intention to foreclose under section 667-23;

(3) The state director of taxation;

(4) The director of finance of the county
where the mortgaged property is located;

(5) The department of commerce and consumer
affairs, by filing the notice with the department when required; and

(6) Any other person entitled to receive
notice under this part.

(f)
As used in this part, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
notice of default and intention to foreclose shall also include any amended
notice that results from participation in the mortgage foreclosure
dispute resolution program under part V. [L 1998, c 122,
pt of §1; am L 2008, c 138, §3; am L 2011, c 48, §21;
am L 2012, c 182, §17]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next